Maine, session 132, LD1725.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §1651, sub-§4, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 383, §1, is
amended to read:
F. Each board of visitors shall share copies of that board's annual report with the other
boards of visitors of that sheriff's office each other board of visitors appointed pursuant
to this section.
Sec. 2. Board of visitors report. By December 3, 2025, the sheriff for each county
shall submit a report to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public Safety
regarding the status of board of visitors vacancies for each jail or other county correctional
facility under the sheriff's supervision. The report must include, at a minimum, for each jail
or other county correctional facility, what actions the sheriff is taking to ensure that the
board of visitors of the jail or facility is meeting its statutory membership requirements;
what current difficulties the jail or facility is facing in meeting board of visitors membership
requirements; how many members are currently appointed to the board of visitors; and
whether the board of visitors is inactive and, if so, for how long it has been inactive. The
committee may submit legislation based on the report to the Second Regular Session of the
132nd Legislature.
Page 1 - 132LR1136(03)